hu: Agyag és modellező gyurma alapanyag: Kukoricakeményítő-alapú; Hab; Természetes agyag (föld/kerámia); Olajalapú (gyurma); Papíralapú; Polimer (PVC-alapú); Sógyurma; Szilikonalapú; Vízalapú; Viaszalapú; Egyéb
nl: Klei en boetseerdeeg basismateriaal: Op basis van maïzena; Schuim; Natuurlijke klei (aarde/keramiek); Op oliebasis (plastilina); Op papierbasis; Polymeer (op pvc-basis); Zoutdeeg; Op siliconenbasis; Op waterbasis; Op wasbasis; Anders
sv: Basmaterial för lera och modelleringsdeg: Majsstärkelsebaserad; Skum; Naturlera (keramisk lera/keramik); Oljebaserad (plastilina); Pappersbaserad; Polymer (PVC-baserad); Trolldeg; Silikonbaserad; Vattenbaserad; Vaxbaserad; Annat
pl: Materiał bazowy gliny i masy modelarskiej: Na bazie skrobi kukurydzianej; Pianka; Glina naturalna (ziemna / ceramiczna); Na bazie oleju (plastelina); Na bazie papieru; Polimerowa (na bazie PVC); Masa solna; Na bazie silikonu; Na bazie wody; Na bazie wosku; Inny
ko: 점토 및 모델링 반죽 기본 재질: 옥수수 전분 기반; 폼; 천연 점토(흙/도자기); 유성(플라스틸리나); 종이 기반; 폴리머(PVC 기반); 소금 반죽; 실리콘 기반; 수성; 왁스 기반; 기타
hr-HR: Osnovni materijal od gline i tijesta za modeliranje: Na bazi kukuruznog škroba; Pjena; Prirodna glina (zemljana/keramička); Na bazi ulja (plastelin); Na bazi papira; Polimer (na bazi PVC-a); Slano tijesto; Na bazi silikona; Na bazi vode; Na bazi voska; Ostalo
es: Material base de la arcilla y masa para modelar: A base de maicena; Espuma; Arcilla natural (barro/cerámica); A base de aceite (plastilina); A base de papel; Polímero (a base de PVC); Masa de sal; A base de silicona; A base de agua; A base de cera; Otro
el: Βασικό υλικό πηλού ή πλαστελίνης: Με βάση το άμυλο καλαμποκιού; Αφρός; Φυσικός πηλός (χωμάτινος/κεραμικός); Με βάση το λάδι (πλαστελίνη); Με βάση το χαρτί; Πολυμερικός (με βάση το PVC); Ζύμη αλατιού; Με βάση τη σιλικόνη; Με βάση το νερό; Με βάση το κερί; Άλλο
nb: Leire og modelleringsdeig som basismateriale: Maisstivelsesbasert; Skum; Naturlig leire (jord / keramisk); Oljebasert (plastilina); Papirbasert; Polymer (PVC-basert); Trolldeig; Silikonbasert; Vannbasert; Voksbasert; Annet
de: Basismaterial von Ton und Modelliermasse: Auf Maisstärkebasis; Schaum; Naturton (Erde/Keramik); Auf Ölbasis (Plastilina); Auf Papierbasis; Polymer (auf PVC-Basis); Salzteig; Auf Silikonbasis; Auf Wasserbasis; Auf Wachsbasis; Sonstige
it: Materiale di base in argilla e pasta modellabile: A base di amido di mais; Schiuma; Argilla naturale (terra/ceramica); A base di olio (plastilina); A base di carta; Polimero (a base di PVC); Pasta di sale; A base di silicone; A base d’acqua; A base di cera; Altro
ro-RO: Materialul bazei de lut și aluat de modelat: Pe bază de amidon de porumb; Spumă; Lut natural (pământ/ceramică); Pe bază de ulei (plastilină); Pe bază de hârtie; Polimer (pe bază de PVC); Aluat sărat; Pe bază de silicon; Pe bază de apă; Pe bază de ceară; Altele
sl-SI: Osnovni material gline in modelirne mase: Na osnovi koruznega škroba; Pena; Naravna glina (lončarska/keramična); Na oljni osnovi (plastelin); Na osnovi papirja; Polimer (na osnovi PVC-ja); Slano testo; Na silikonski osnovi; Na vodni osnovi; Na osnovi voska; Drugo
da: Grundmateriale i modellervoks og modellermasse: Majsstivelsesbaseret; Skum; Naturler (jord/keramik); Oliebaseret (plastilina); Papirbaseret; Polymer (PVC-baseret); Trylledej; Silikonebaseret; Vandbaseret; Voksbaseret; Andet
en: Clay & modeling dough base material: Cornstarch-based; Foam; Natural clay (earthen/ceramic); Oil-based (plastilina); Paper-based; Polymer (PVC-based); Salt dough; Silicone-based; Water-based; Wax-based; Other
lt-LT: Molio ir modeliavimo masės bazinė medžiaga: Kukurūzų krakmolo pagrindo; Putų; Natūralus molis (žemės / keraminis); Aliejaus pagrindo (plastilinas); Popieriaus pagrindo; Polimerinis (PVC pagrindo); Druskos tešla; Silikono pagrindo; Vandens pagrindo; Vaško pagrindo; Kita
pt-PT: Material base de argila e massa de modelar: À base de amido de milho; Espuma; Argila natural (barro/cerâmica); À base de óleo (plastilina); À base de papel; Polímero (à base de PVC); Massa de sal; À base de silicone; À base de água; À base de cera; Outro
ja: 粘土・造形用粘土のベース素材: コーンスターチベース; フォーム; 天然粘土 (土/陶土); オイルベース (プラスティリーナ); 紙ベース; ポリマー (PVCベース); ソルトドウ; シリコンベース; 水性; ワックスベース; その他
pt-BR: Material de base de argila e massa de modelar: À base de amido de milho; Espuma; Argila natural (barro/cerâmica); À base de óleo (plastilina); À base de papel; Polímero (à base de PVC); Massa de sal; À base de silicone; À base de água; À base de cera; Outro
zh-TW: 黏土與塑型黏土基材: 玉米澱粉基底; 泡棉; 天然黏土 (陶土/陶瓷); 油性 (塑膠黏土); 紙基底; 聚合物 (PVC 基底); 鹽麵團; 矽膠基底; 水性; 蠟基底; 其他
vi: Chất liệu cơ bản của đất sét và bột nặn: Có thành phần bột ngô; Xốp; Đất sét tự nhiên (đất nung/gốm); Gốc dầu (plastilina); Gốc giấy; Polymer (gốc PVC); Bột nặn từ muối; Gốc silicone; Gốc nước; Gốc sáp; Khác
fi: Saven ja muovailumassan perusmateriaali: Maissitärkkelyspohjainen; Vaahto; Luonnonsavi (maa/keramiikka); Öljypohjainen (plastoliini); Paperipohjainen; Polymeeri (PVC-pohjainen); Suolataikina; Silikonipohjainen; Vesipohjainen; Vahapohjainen; Muu
ru: Базовый материал глины и массы для лепки: На основе кукурузного крахмала; Пенная; Натуральная глина (земляная/керамическая); На масляной основе (пластилин); На бумажной основе; Полимерная (на основе ПВХ); Соленое тесто; На силиконовой основе; На водной основе; На восковой основе; Другое
th: วัสดุพื้นฐานสำหรับปั้นดินเหนียวและแป้งปั้น: ทำจากแป้งข้าวโพด; โฟม; ดินธรรมชาติ (ดินเผา/เซรามิก); ทำจากน้ำมัน (Plastilina); ทำจากกระดาษ; โพลิเมอร์ (ทำจาก PVC); แป้งเกลือ; ทำจากซิลิโคน; สูตรน้ำ; ทำจากขี้ผึ้ง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Základný materiál hliny a modelovacej hmoty: Na báze kukuričného škrobu; Pena; Prírodná hlina (zemitá/keramická); Na báze oleja (plastelína); Na báze papiera; Polymérová (na báze PVC); Slané cesto; Na báze silikónu; Na báze vody; Na báze vosku; Iné
cs: Základní materiál z hlíny a modelovacího těsta: Na bázi kukuřičného škrobu; Pěna; Přírodní jíl (zemina/keramika); Na bázi oleje (plastelína); Na bázi papíru; Polymer (na bázi PVC); Slané těsto; Na bázi silikonu; Na bázi vody; Na bázi vosku; Jiné
fr: Matériau de base de l’argile et de la pâte à modeler: À base de fécule de maïs; Mousse; Argile naturelle (terre cuite/céramique); À base d’huile (plastiline); À base de papier; Polymère (à base de PVC); Pâte à sel; À base de silicone; À base d’eau; À base de cire; Autre
bg-BG: Основен материал на глината и моделиращото тесто: На основата на царевично нишесте; Пяна; Естествена глина (земна/керамична); На маслена основа (пластилин); На хартиена основа; Полимерна (на основата на PVC); Солено тесто; На силиконова основа; На водна основа; На восъчна основа; Друго
tr: Kil ve modelleme hamuru temel malzemesi: Mısır nişastası bazlı; Köpük; Doğal kil (toprak/seramik); Yağ bazlı (plastilin); Kağıt bazlı; Polimer (PVC bazlı); Tuz hamuru; Silikon bazlı; Su bazlı; Balmumu bazlı; Diğer
zh-CN: 黏土与造型彩泥基础材质: 玉米淀粉基; 泡沫; 天然粘土（陶土/陶瓷）; 油基（橡皮泥）; 纸基; 聚合物（PVC 基）; 盐面团; 硅胶基; 水基; 蜡基; 其他